Utah statutes.
48-1d-107.   Partnership agreement -- Effect on partnership and person becoming partner -- Preformation agreement.

(1)  A partnership is bound by and may enforce the partnership agreement, whether or not the partnership has itself manifested assent to the partnership agreement.

(2)  A person that becomes a partner of a partnership is deemed to assent to the partnership agreement.

(3)  Two or more persons intending to become the initial partners of a partnership may make an agreement providing that upon the formation of the partnership the agreement will become the partnership agreement.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

